Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 1. In General

§ 41-11-101.
Duties of attorney general.

The attorney general shall be the legal advisor to the commission and it shall be his duty to defend any suit or suits that may be instituted against the state of Wyoming, or against the water users and appropriators from this state, by the United States government, or by any other state, involving the question of priorities and rights of interstate streams; or if advisable to prosecute any suit necessary to properly safeguard the interests of the state or its citizens, in such interstate streams.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 102, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 71-2605; W.S. 1957, § 41-480.

Cross references. —

For duties of attorney general as to interstate streams, under direction of governor, see §

9-1-605

.